hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta za činele: Bell činela; China činela; Crash činela; Torba/kovčeg za činele; Filčevi i navlake za činele; Stalak za činele; Efekt činela; Hi-hat činele (par); Ride činela; Splash činela; Stack činela; Ostalo
tr: Dahil edilen zil seti bileşenleri: Çan zili; China zili; Crash zil; Zil çantası/kılıfı; Zil keçeleri ve kılıfları; Zil sehpası; Efekt zili; Hi-hat zilleri (çift); Ride zil; Splash zil; Stack zil; Diğer
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดฉาบที่รวมมาด้วย: ฉาบเบลล์; ฉาบไชน่า; ฉาบแครช; กระเป๋า/เคสใส่ฉาบ; สักหลาดและปลอกรองฉาบ; ขาตั้งฉาบ; ฉาบเอฟเฟกต์; ไฮแฮท (คู่); ฉาบไรด์; ฉาบสแปลช; ฉาบสแต็ก; อื่นๆ
ja: シンバルキットコンポーネント付き: ベルシンバル; チャイナシンバル; クラッシュシンバル; シンバルバッグ / ケース; シンバルフェルト＆スリーブ; シンバルスタンド; エフェクトシンバル; ハイハットシンバル (ペア); ライドシンバル; スプラッシュシンバル; スタックシンバル; その他
zh-CN: 包括镲片套装组件: 钟镲; 中国镲; 碎音镲; 镲片包/盒; 镲片毡垫和套管; 镲架; 效果镲; 踩镲（一对）; 叮叮镲; 水镲; 叠镲; 其他
ko: 심벌즈 키트 구성품 포함: 벨 심벌; 차이나 심벌; 크래시 심벌; 심벌 가방/케이스; 심벌 펠트 및 슬리브; 심벌 스탠드; 이펙트 심벌; 하이햇 심벌(쌍); 라이드 심벌; 스플래시 심벌; 스택 심벌; 기타
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα κιτ κυμβάλων: Πιατίνι Bell; Πιατίνι China; Πιατίνι Crash; Τσάντα/Θήκη πιατινιών; Τσόχες και προστατευτικά πιατινιών; Βάση πιατινιού; Πιατίνι εφέ; Πιατίνια hi-hat (ζεύγος); Πιατίνι Ride; Πιατίνι Splash; Πιατίνι Stack; Άλλο
ro-RO: Componente incluse în kitul cinelului: Cinel Bell; Cinel China; Cinel Crash; Husă/cutie pentru cinele; Pâsle și manșoane pentru cinele; Stativ pentru cinel; Cinel pentru efecte; Cinele Hi-Hat (pereche); Cinel Ride; Cinel Splash; Cinel Stack; Altele
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i symbalsett: Bjelle-cymbal; China-cymbal; Crash-cymbal; Cymbalbag/-kasse; Cymbalfilt og -hylser; Cymbalstativ; Effekt-cymbal; Hi-hat-cymbaler (par); Ride-cymbal; Splash-cymbal; Stack-cymbal; Annet
fr: Composants du kit de cymbales inclus: Cymbale cloche; Cymbale china; Cymbale crash; Housse/étui pour cymbale; Feutres et manchons pour cymbale; Pied de cymbale; Cymbale d’effets; Cymbales charleston (paire); Cymbale ride; Cymbale splash; Cymbale stack; Autre
es: Componentes del kit de platillos incluidos: Platillo de campana; Platillo china; Platillo crash; Bolsa/estuche para platillos; Fieltros y fundas para platillos; Soporte para platillos; Platillo de efectos; Platillos hi-hat (par); Platillo ride; Platillo splash; Platillo stack; Otro
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto de pratos incluídos: Prato bell; Prato china; Prato crash; Saco/estojo para pratos; Feltros e mangas para pratos; Suporte de prato; Prato de efeitos; Pratos de choques (par); Prato ride; Prato splash; Prato stack; Outro
lt-LT: Į būgnų lėkščių rinkinį įeinantys komponentai: Varpelio lėkštė; Kiniško tipo („China“) lėkštė; Akcentinė („Crash“) lėkštė; Lėkščių krepšys / dėklas; Lėkščių veltiniai ir įvorės; Lėkštės stovas; Efektų lėkštė; Haito („Hi-hat“) lėkštės (pora); Ritminė („Ride“) lėkštė; Pliuško („Splash“) lėkštė; Sudedamosios lėkštės; Kita
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit de címbalo: Prato bell; Prato china; Prato crash; Bolsa/estojo para prato; Feltros e luvas para pratos; Suporte de prato; Prato de efeitos; Pratos de chimbal (par); Prato ride; Prato splash; Prato stack; Outros
hu: Mellékelt cintányérkészlet-tartozékok: Harang cintányér; Kína cintányér; Beütő cintányér; Cintányértok/táska; Cintányér filcek és hüvelyek; Cintányérállvány; Effekt cintányér; Lábcin (pár); Kísérő cintányér; Splash cintányér; Stack (rakott) cintányér; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vključeni sestavni deli kompleta činel: Činela Bell; Činela China; Činela Crash; Torba/kovček za činele; Filci in obojke za činele; Stojalo za činele; Efektna činela; Činele Hi-hat (par); Činela Ride; Činela Splash; Činela Stack; Drugo
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu talerzy perkusyjnych: Talerz bell; Talerz china; Talerz crash; Pokrowiec / futerał na talerze; Filce i tulejki do talerzy; Statyw pod talerz; Talerz efektowy; Talerze hi-hat (para); Talerz ride; Talerz splash; Talerz stack; Inne
it: Componenti del kit di piatti inclusi: Piatto bell; Piatto china; Piatto crash; Borsa/custodia per piatti; Feltrini e guaine per piatti; Asta per piatti; Piatto per effetti; Piatti hi-hat (coppia); Piatto ride; Piatto splash; Piatto stack; Altro
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплекта чинели: Чинел бел; Чинел чайна; Чинел краш; Чанта/Калъф за чинели; Филцове и втулки за чинели; Стойка за чинел; Ефектен чинел; Чинели фус (чифт); Чинел райд; Чинел сплаш; Чинел стак; Други
en: Cymbal kit components included: Bell cymbal; China cymbal; Crash cymbal; Cymbal bag/case; Cymbal felts & sleeves; Cymbal stand; Effects cymbal; Hi-hat cymbals (pair); Ride cymbal; Splash cymbal; Stack cymbal; Other
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des Becken-Sets: Bell-Becken; China-Becken; Crash-Becken; Becken-Tasche/-Koffer; Becken-Filze & -Hülsen; Beckenständer; Effekt-Becken; Hi-Hat-Becken (Paar); Ride-Becken; Splash-Becken; Stack-Becken; Sonstige
sv: Ingående komponenter i cymbalkit: Klockcymbal; Chinacymbal; Crashcymbal; Cymbalväska/-fodral; Cymbalfilt och cymbalhylsor; Cymbalstativ; Effektcymbal; Hi-hat-cymbaler (par); Ridecymbal; Splashcymbal; Stackcymbal; Annat
zh-TW: 包含銅鈸組組件: 鐘鈸; 中國鈸; 碎音鈸; 鈸袋/琴盒; 鈸毛氈和套管; 鈸架; 效果鈸; 腳踏鈸 (一對); 節奏鈸; 點鈸; 疊鈸; 其他
cs: Součásti sady činelů v balení: Činel bell; Činel china; Činel crash; Obal/kufr na činely; Plstěné podložky a trubičky k činelům; Stojan na činel; Efektový činel; Činely hi-hat (pár); Činel ride; Činel splash; Činel stack; Jiné
da: Sætkomponenter til bækken medfølger: Klokkebækken; China-bækken; Crash-bækken; Bækkentaske/-kasse; Bækkenfilt og hylstre; Bækkenstativ; Effekt-bækken; Hihat-bækkener (par); Ride-bækken; Splash-bækken; Stack-bækken; Andet
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm trong bộ chũm chọe: Chũm chọe Bell; Chũm chọe China; Chũm chọe crash; Túi/hộp đựng chũm chọe; Vòng nỉ & ống lót chũm chọe; Chân đế chũm chọe; Chũm chọe hiệu ứng; Chũm chọe hi-hat (cặp); Chũm chọe ride; Chũm chọe splash; Chũm chọe stack; Khác
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí sady činelov: Bell činel; China činel; Crash činel; Taška/puzdro na činely; Plste a puzdrá na činely; Stojan na činely; Efektový činel; Hi-hat činely (pár); Ride činel; Splash činel; Stack činel; Iné
ru: Состав набора тарелок: Тарелка бэлл (Bell); Тарелка чайна (China); Тарелка крэш (Crash); Чехол/кейс для тарелок; Фетровые прокладки и втулки для тарелок; Стойка для тарелки; Эффект-тарелка; Тарелки хай-хэт (пара); Тарелка райд (Ride); Тарелка сплэш (Splash); Тарелка стэк (Stack); Другое
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen bekkenset: Bell-bekken; China-bekken; Crash-bekken; Bekkentas/-koffer; Bekkenviltjes en -hoezen; Bekkenstandaard; Effect-bekken; Hihat-bekkens (paar); Ride-bekken; Splash-bekken; Stack-bekken; Overig
fi: Symbaalisetin mukana tulevat komponentit: Bell-symbaali; China-symbaali; Crash-symbaali; Symbaalilaukku/-kotelo; Symbaalien huovat ja holkit; Symbaaliteline; Efektisymbaali; Hi-hat-symbaalit (pari); Ride-symbaali; Splash-symbaali; Stack-symbaali; Muu